North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53A. Business Development Corporations and North Carolina Capital Resource Corporations.
Article 2. North Carolina Capital Resource Corporations. [Repealed]

§§ 53A-20 through 53A-34.

Expired.

Editor’s Note.

G.S. 53A-34 of this Article provided, inter alia, that if no corporation was organized pursuant to this Article at the expiration of three years after July 1, 1987, the Article would expire on that date. According to information from the Secretary of State’s office and the Commissioner of Banks, no corporation was formed under this Article as of July 1, 1990; therefore, the Revisor of Statutes has directed that this Article be set out as expired, effective July 1, 1990.